Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 6. State Forests.
Sec. 41.17.500.
Southeast State Forest.

Subject to valid existing rights, the state-owned or acquired land and water lying within the parcels described in (d) and (e) of this section is designated as the Southeast State Forest.

The commissioner shall prepare a management plan for the Southeast State Forest under AS

41.17.230

.

The commissioner may establish transportation corridors within the Southeast State Forest.

The Southeast State Forest includes the state-owned or acquired land within the following described parcels:

Township 62 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 65 South, Range 78 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 65 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 65 South, Range 89 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 65 South, Range 90 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 66 South, Range 78 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 66 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 68 South, Range 76 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 68 South, Range 81 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 69 South, Range 76 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 69 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 69 South, Range 80 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 70 South, Range 77 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 70 South, Range 78 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 71 South, Range 81 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 71 South, Range 82 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 71 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 71 South, Range 90 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 72 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 75 South, Range 89 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 75 South, Range 90 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 76 South, Range 90 East, Copper River Meridian

In addition to the lands described in (d) of this section, the Southeast State Forest includes the state-owned or acquired land within the following described parcels:

Township 59 South, Range 80 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 60 South, Range 71 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 61 South, Range 81 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 61 South, Range 82 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 62 South, Range 80 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 62 South, Range 81 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 62 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 63 South, Range 80 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 63 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 64 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 64 South, Range 85 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 66 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 68 South, Range 76 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 68 South, Range 81 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 68 South, Range 82 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 69 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 69 South, Range 80 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 70 South, Range 90 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 70 South, Range 91 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 72 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 73 South, Range 92 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 74 South, Range 84 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 74 South, Range 89 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 75 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 75 South, Range 89 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 77 South, Range 88 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 78 South, Range 81 East, Copper River Meridian

Nothing in this section prevents the City and Borough of Wrangell from exercising its land selection rights under AS

29.65.040(d)

to state land within its boundaries. If new municipalities are incorporated before June 30, 2019, and lands designated in (d) and (e) of this section are within their boundaries, those lands that were classified as vacant, unappropriated, unreserved state land before establishment of the Southeast State Forest shall be used to calculate the municipal entitlement acreage under AS

29.65.030

but may not be selected.

Section 9: E1/2SE1/4, Government Lots 1 and 2

Section 10: S1/2

Section 11: N1/2, E1/2SE1/4, W1/2SW1/4, and Government Lots 1 — 4

Section 12: W1/2, W1/2E1/2

Section 13: W1/2W1/2, NE1/4NW1/4, NW1/4NE1/4

Section 14: E1/2NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4, W1/2NW1/4, and Government Lots 1 — 4

Section 15: N1/2, N1/2SE1/4, NE1/4SW1/4

Section 16: Government Lot 1, and the portion of Government Lot 2 Northerly of the East-West centerline of Section 16

Section 23: NE1/4NE1/4, and Government Lots 1 and 3

Section 24: SE1/4NW1/4, W1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4, and Government Lots 1 and 2

Section 25: NE1/4NE1/4, and Government Lots 1 — 3;

Section 36: E1/2;

Section 31: E1/2NW1/4, and Government Lots 1 and 2;

Tract A: The portion within Protracted Sections 25 and 36, and the portion in the E1/2E1/2 of Protracted Section 26;

Tracts A — G; Tract H: The portion within Protracted Sections 13 — 15 and 24, and the portion within the N1/2NE1/4 of Protracted Section 23; Tract K within Protracted Section 30; and Tract L;

Section 1: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 12: NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4

Section 24: E1/2E1/2, and Government Lots 1 — 7

Section 25: E1/2NE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, and Government Lots 1 — 5;

Section 6: SW1/4SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4, and Government Lots 1 and 2

Section 7: N1/2NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, and Government Lot 1;

Section 10: S1/2SW1/4

Section 15: NW1/4, S1/2NE1/4, N1/2S1/2

Section 31: E1/2, E1/2W1/2, and Government Lots 1 — 4

Section 32

Section 33: S1/2, NW1/4

Section 34: NW1/4SW1/4;

Section 3: NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4, and Government Lots 3 and 4

Section 4

Section 8: Government Lot 1

Section 9: E1/2, E1/2W1/2, and Government Lots 1 — 4

Section 11: N1/2;

Section 1: N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 2: NE1/4, N1/2SE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4;

Section 23: E1/2SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4

Section 24: W1/2SW1/4;

Section 9: SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, and Government Lot 1

Section 10: SW1/4, S1/2NW1/4

Section 15: SE1/4

Section 21: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 22: NE1/4, W1/2SE1/4, S1/2SW1/4

Section 27: N1/2NW1/4

Section 28: NE1/4NE1/4;

Section 23: E1/2NE1/4

Section 24: N1/2, N1/2SW1/4, N1/2SE1/4;

Section 16: Government Lot 5

Section 18: W1/2, W1/2NE1/4, W1/2SE1/4

Section 19: That portion of Government Lot 1 within the NW1/4NE1/4, W1/2NW1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4

Section 20: S1/2

Section 21: That portion of Government Lot 3 within the E1/2; SW1/4; and the parcel described as: commencing at the NW 1/16 corner of Section 21, the point of beginning; thence Northerly along the W 1/16 line to the mean high water line of Sea Otter Sound; thence Northerly and Easterly along the mean high water line of Sea Otter Sound to the intersection with the North-South centerline of Section 21; thence Southerly to the C 1/4 of Section 21; thence Westerly to the NW 1/16 corner of Section 21 and the point of beginning;

Section 13: NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4, S1/2NE1/4, NW1/4NE1/4;

Section 18: S1/2SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 19: N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4;

Section 14: W1/2

Section 15: E1/2, S1/2SW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4

Section 16: S1/2SE1/4

Section 21: N1/2NE1/4

Section 22: E1/2, NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4

Section 23: W1/2

Section 26: NW1/4

Section 27: N1/2NE1/4;

Section 16: SW1/4SW1/4, and Government Lots 1 and 2

Section 17: Government Lots 1 — 4

Section 20: Government Lot 1

Section 21: SE1/4NW1/4, and Government Lots 1 — 6;

Section 1: SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 12: E1/2, E1/2NW1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 13: N1/2NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4;

Section 13: SW1/4NE1/4, W1/2SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4, SW1/4, E1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, and Government Lot 1

Section 14: SE1/4, Government Lot 1

Section 23: N1/2NE1/4

Section 24: N1/2N1/2;

Tract A: Within Protracted Sections 27, 28, 33, and 34, and the portion in the W1/2W1/2 of Protracted Section 35;

Tract A: Within Protracted Sections 3 — 6, 8, 9, 16, and 17; the portion in the W1/2W1/2 of Protracted Section 2; and the portion in the W1/2NW1/4 and the SW1/4 of Protracted Section 11.

Section 4: Government Lots 4 — 5, and W1/2SE1/4 lying West of and excluding ASLS 95-66

Section 9: E1/2 lying West of and excluding ASLS 95-66

Section 15: W1/2E1/2

Section 22: NE1/4

Section 23: W1/2W1/2;

Section 12: N1/2;

Section 17: Government Lot 1, and NW1/4SW1/4

Section 18: Government Lots 1 and 2, and N1/2SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 19: Government Lots 1 - 10, and SE1/4SE1/4

Section 20: Government Lots 1 - 6, and SW1/4SW1/4;

Section 36: NE1/4 and NE1/4NW1/4, those portions North of the Mitkof Highway right-of-way;

Tract A: All that portion of Tract A that is Northerly, Westerly, and Northwesterly of a random line that begins at the terminus of the Mitkof Highway which projects Northeasterly at a right angle to the Mitkof Highway and ends at the mean high water line of Sumner Strait of the Mitkof Highway, within Sections 1, 12 - 14, 22, 23, and 27

Section 30: S1/2SE1/4

Section 31: Government Lots 1 — 4, NW1/4NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, those portions Northerly of the Mitkof Highway right-of-way;

Section 12: Government Lot 1, SE1/4SE1/4, those portions Northerly of Forest Development Road 6425

Section 13: Government Lots 1 and 2, those portions Northerly of Forest Development Road 6245

Section 33, excluding USS 1719

Section 34: Government Lot 1;

Section 3: S1/2NW1/4, SW1/4

Section 4: Government Lots 1 and 2, and E1/2

Section 7: Government Lots 1 — 3 and SW1/4SE1/4, those portions Northerly of Forest Development Road 6245

Section 8: S1/2SW1/4, SE1/4, those portions Northerly of Forest Development Road 6245

Section 9: NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, those portions Northerly of Forest Development Road 6245

Section 10: NW1/4NW1/4, that portion Northwesterly of Forest Development Road 6245;

Section 27: Government Lots 1 — 4, and SW1/4SW1/4, excluding ASLS 83-8

Section 28: Tract B ASLS 94-135

Section 34: Government Lot 2, NW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, and NE1/4SE1/4, excluding ASLS 83-8

Section 35: Government Lots 1 — 4, SW1/4SE1/4, and N1/2SW1/4, excluding ASLS 83-8;

Section 4: Government Lot 1;

Section 1: Government Lots 1 — 4

Section 2: Government Lot 1, W1/2NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, and SE1/4

Section 11: W1/2E1/2, W1/2E1/2E1/2

Section 14: W1/2E1/2, W1/2E1/2E1/2

Section 23: W1/2E1/2E1/2, W1/2SE1/4, and SW1/4

Section 26: NW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4, and SW1/4SW1/4

Section 27: SE1/4NE1/4, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4, and SW1/4SW1/4

Section 33: E1/2NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4, and SW1/4SW1/4

Section 34;

Section 4: N1/2, N1/2SW1/4

Section 5: Government Lots 1 — 5, NE1/4NE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4

Section 8: Government Lots 1, 5, and 6, NE1/4NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, W1/2SE1/4, excluding ASLS 83-7

Section 17: W1/2NE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, W1/2SE1/4, and E1/2SW1/4, excluding ASLS 83-7;

Section 3: S1/2SE1/4

Section 8: E1/2

Section 9: S1/2

Section 10: NE1/4, S1/2

Section 15

Section 16: N1/2, SE1/4;

Section 23: E1/2SW1/4

Section 24: E1/2

Section 25: Government Lots 3 and 6, those portions lying Easterly or Northerly of ASLS 96-32, and those portions lying Easterly of ASLS 2000-23, NE1/4, and E1/2SE1/4

Section 26: E1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, and Tract M, ASLS 81-217

Section 27: SE1/4NE1/4, and Tract K, ASLS 81-217, that portion Northerly of Forest Development Road 3060

Section 36: Government Lot 1, that portion excluding ASLS 81-217;

Section 23: Government Lots 3 and 4 and NE1/4, W1/2SE1/4

Section 24: Government Lots 2 — 4

Section 26: Government Lots 1 and 4 — 9, and that portion of Government Lot 2 excluding Block 14 ASLS 81-116, and the NW1/4NE1/4

Section 35: Government Lot 1;

Section 1: NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SE1/4

Section 7: Government Lots 2 and 3, E1/2NW1/4;

Section 15: Government Lots 7 — 12, N1/2NW1/4, those portions Northwesterly of Forest Development Road 1470

Section 24: Government Lots 18 and 19, those portions within the protracted E1/2SW1/4 and W1/2SE1/4;

Section 8: S1/2SE1/4

Section 9: S1/2SW1/4

Section 15: NW1/4

Section 16: Government Lot 7, that portion of Government Lot 8 North of the North 1/16 line, NE1/4NE1/4, NW1/4NW1/4

Section 17: Government Lots 1 and 2

Section 21: Government Lots 4, 5, and 7 Southerly of ASLS 85-335

Section 22: N1/2SW1/4

Section 28: Government Lots 1 and 2;

Tracts A and B within Section 13;

Government Tract A, excluding Tracts A — F of ASLS 2003-49 within Sections 17, 18, 20 — 22, and 27 — 29;

Protracted Section 1: W1/2SW1/4

Protracted Section 2: E1/2SE1/4, that portion lying above the mean high water line of Thorne Bay

Protracted Section 12: W1/2NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4;

Section 20: SE1/4SW1/4

Section 29: Government Lots 3 and 4, that portion of Government Lot 7 lying Northeasterly of ASLS 84-39, and SW1/4NW1/4, excluding ASLS 84-39

Section 30: Government Lots 1, 2, and 4, NE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4NE1/4;

Section 17: Government Lot 12, SW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SW1/4

Section 18: Government Lots 7 and 8, W1/2SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 19: Government Lots 1 and 2, NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4

Section 20: Government Lots 1 and 2, SW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4;

Section 26: Government Lots 1 — 3

Section 35: Government Lots 1 — 7, W1/2SE1/4

Section 36: Government Lot 1;

Section 27: Government Lots 1 and 2

Section 28: Government Lots 1 — 3

Section 33: Government Lot 1

Section 34: That portion within the Protracted S1/2 and S1/2NW1/4;

Section 1: Government Lots 1 — 4, SW1/4NW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4

Section 2: Government Lots 1 — 4, NE1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, excluding ASLS 85-86

Section 11: Those portions Northeasterly of Forest Development Road 8110 within Government Lots 1 and 2, excluding ASLS 85-86

Section 12: Those portions Northeasterly of Forest Development Road 8110 within Government Lots 1 — 4, SW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4, and NE1/4SW1/4;

Section 12: Protracted SE1/4SW1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 13: Protracted N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 14: Government Lot 25, that portion within the Protracted N1/2SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4, E1/2SE1/4SW1/4, and N1/2SW1/4

Section 15: Government Lot 5, that portion within the Protracted N1/2SW1/4

Section 23: Government Lot 5, that portion Southeasterly of Forest Development Road 2160;

Section 1: Those portions lying above the mean high water line of Hook Arm within the SW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4, and S1/2

Section 2: Those portions lying above the mean high water line of Hook Arm within the S1/2N1/2, and S1/2 including all islands within Section 2

Section 3: Those portions lying above the mean high water line of Foul Bay within the S1/2NE1/4, N1/2SE1/4, and SE1/4SE1/4

Section 10: That portion lying above the mean high water line of Hook Arm within the E1/2NE1/4

Section 11: Those portions lying above the mean high water line of Hook Arm within the N1/2 and N1/2SW1/4 including all islands within Section 11

Section 12: Those portions lying above the mean high water line of Hook Arm within the N1/2N1/2, and the SW1/4NW1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 2010; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 31 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f) and relettered in 2011, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (f) and internal references in subsections (a) and (f) were conformed.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective September 8, 2011, inserted “and (e)” in (a) and (f); and added (e). Although the 2011 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2011 under § 6, ch. 31, SLA 2011, the Governor did not sign the bill until September 7, 2011, and so the actual effective date of the 2011 amendments was September 8, 2011 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 112, SLA 2010 (HB 162), proposing establishment of the Southeast State Forest, see 2009 House Journal 370 — 372.